District of Columbia statutes.
1-911.04

Effect on other laws.

(a)

The provisions of this chapter supersede any provisions of other law which are inconsistent with this chapter and the regulations thereunder.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to alter or amend in any way the provisions of existing laws relating to the program of annuities, other retirement benefits, or medical benefits for members and officers, retired members and officers, and survivors thereof, of the United States Park Police force, the United States Secret Service, or the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 204, 45 DCR 4045
Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-786.4.